apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="ca/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aym</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amayd</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aee</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aee</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aee</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aee</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aym</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aysmayd</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ays</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ays</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ays</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ays</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aagh</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aagh</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aagh</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aagh</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aagh</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uaigey</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a-shiu</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ait</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/aagh__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aagh</l>
          <r>aagh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iyn</l>
          <r>aagh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mieys__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/agh__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r>agh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>agh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maren/nym__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nym</l>
          <r>nym<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>myn</l>
          <r>nym<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="barnagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arn</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="banjagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>anj</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="faaishnagh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>aaishn</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="greallagh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>reall</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shaslagh"><par n="initial-sh"/><i>asl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="coonlagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oonl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Libyagh"><i>Liby</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="co-lhiabbagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>o-lhiabb</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="whinclagh"><i>whincl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sharragh"><par n="initial-sh"/><i>arr</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shenn-chaillagh"><par n="initial-sh"/><i>enn-chaill</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="benaaghtagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>enaaght</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gounagh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oun</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ingagh"><par n="initial-i"/><i>ng</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="giallagh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>iall</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="renniagh"><i>renni</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lheeagh"><i>lhee</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leagh"><i>le</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cragh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>r</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="caa"><par n="initial-c"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saagh"><par n="initial-s"/><i></i><par n="s/aagh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="keyllagh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>eyll</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shellagh"><par n="initial-sh"/><i>ell</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="creeagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ree</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="creagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>re</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="brashlagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rashl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="doagh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>o</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="wooishlagh"><i>wooishl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="claasagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>laas</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skyrtlagh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>kyrtl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Pershagh"><par n="initial-P"/><i>ersh</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mynchlagh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ynchl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="magh"><par n="initial-m"/><i></i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="keeagh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ee</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ullaagagh"><par n="initial-u"/><i>llaag</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="smooirlagh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>mooirl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lesbeeagh"><i>lesbee</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bun-chlagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>un-chl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="luiragh"><i>luir</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mooar-chlagh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ooar-chl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="benaeglagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>enaegl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lhargagh"><i>lharg</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rimlagh"><i>riml</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mwatlag-maaigagh"><par n="initial-mw"/><i>atlag-maaig</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="strig-ghounagh"><par n="initial-str"/><i>ig-ghoun</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nymphagh"><i>nymph</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="marennym"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aren</i><par n="maren/nym__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="meeshagh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eesh</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="laagh"><i>la</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="breinchlagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>reinchl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="creenaght"><par n="initial-c"/><i>reenaght</i><par n="mieys__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="volgagh"><i>volg</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rhineclagh"><i>rhinecl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="scoagh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>co</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="clagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>l</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="geinnagh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>einn</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ollagh"><par n="initial-o"/><i>ll</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cannagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ann</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mieys"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ieys</i><par n="mieys__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="undaagagh"><par n="initial-u"/><i>ndaag</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sladdagh"><par n="initial-sl"/><i>add</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="poyllagh"><par n="initial-p"/><i>oyll</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="traagh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ra</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ynlagh"><i>ynl</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="brabbanagh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rabban</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
